<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89127-0023 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-27-89.f2.A1022</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 17 / Friday, January 27, 1989/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Comptroller of the Currency</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Part 3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 89-2]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Risk-Based Capital Guidelines</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, Treasury.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> The Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (OCC) isamending 12 CFR Part 3 by adopting an Appendix A thereto which containsrisk-based capital guidelines. The OCC's current capital regulations providea disincentive to national banks holding low risk assets, because the sameamount of capital is required to be held against those assets that mustbe maintained against a highly risky and high yielding asset. Furthermore,the current capital regulations, which are based on total assets, do nottake account of a bank's off-balance sheet activities. The effect of therisk-based capital guidelines will be to individualize bank capital requirementsby tying them to the riskiness of a particular bank's assets and off-balancesheet activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>December 31, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Sanford M. Brown, Attorney, LegalAdvisory Services Division, (202) 447-1880, Jennifer C. Kelly, NationalBank Examiner, Commercial Activities Division (202) 447-1164, or LarryWinter, National Bank Examiner, Multinational and Regional Bank AnalysisDivision (202) 447-1747, Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, Washington,DC 20219.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Introduction</ITAG>These final risk-based capital guidelines are derived from the risk-basedcapital proposal that the U.S. banking agencies published for public commentat 53 FR 8550, March 15, 1988. Portions of the proposal have been modifiedin response to the comments received from the public. A complete discussionof the issues raised by the commenters and the changes from the proposedguidelines is preceded by a brief overview of the final guidelines in thispreamble.These guidelines are supplemental to the existing capital requirementsdetailed in 12 CFR Part 3. The OCC is considering amendments to 12 CFRPart 3, and expects to publish a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking in the verynear future. The amendments, which would become effective December 31,1990, would implement a capital definition that is consistent with thedefinition in these risk-based capital guidelines and establish a new minimumcapital-to-total assets requirement. Transitional arrangements will governcompliance with the risk-based capital guidelines until they are fullyimplemented on December 31, 1992. A brief explanation of the proposed amendmentsto Part 3 and a complete discussion of the OCC's transitional arrangementsfor the risk-based capital guidelines follow this overview of the finalguidelines.Background and PurposeThese final guidelines are consistent with the international frameworkfor capital standards established in July 1988 by the Committee on BankingRegulations and Supervisory Practices (frequently referred to as the CookeCommittee or the Basle Supervisors Committee),\1\<NOTE/> which meets under the auspices of the Bank for InternationalSettlements in Basle, Switzerland. The international framework is alsoknown as the Basle Agreement.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The Cooke Committee consists of representatives of thecentral banks and supervisory authorities from the Group of Ten countries(Belgium, Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, Netherlands, Sweden, Switzerland,United Kingdom, United States), and Luxembourg.Efforts to develop a risk-based capital measure in the United States dateback a number of years. The three U.S. banking agencies (the Federal ReserveBoard, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and the Office of theComptroller of the Currency) first issued a risk-based capital proposalfor public comment at 51 FR 10602, March 27, 1986. A majority of the publiccomments on the 1986 proposal expressed general support for the conceptof basing a bank's capital requirement on the riskiness of its assets andoff-balance sheet activities. Many commenters asserted, however, that withoutsimilar requirements for foreign competitors, the proposed requirementswould put U.S. banks at a competitive disadvantage.In light of those concerns, the U.S. banking agencies began working withthe Bank of England on the development of a common approach. The OCC publisheda proposal based upon a joint U.S./U.K. risk-based capital agreement at52 FR 23045, June 17, 1987. The scope of the international convergenceeffort expanded further when the Cooke Committee took the U.S./U.K. proposalunder consideration and addressed the possibility of expanding the agreementto include all of the countries represented on the Committee.As a result of the Cooke Committee's efforts, the international framework,upon which the guidelines are based, was developed. Thus, the final guidelinesrepresent the culmination of efforts over several years to develop internationallyconsistent capital standards. These final risk-based capital guidelines have a twofold purpose: To makecapital requirements more sensitive to differences in risk profiles amongbanking organizations and to aid in making the definition of bank capitaluniform internationally. To achieve this purpose, the risk-based capital guidelines make severalmodifications to the current capital standard. First, the guidelines recognizethe riskiness of assets by lowering capital requirements for some assetsthat clearly have less credit risk than others. Second, the guidelinesrecognize the risk inherent in off-balance sheet activities and requirethat banks hold capital against them. Third, the guidelines establish adefinition of capital and a minimum risk-based capital standard that areconsistent internationally, and place a greater emphasis on equity capital.A bank's risk-based capital ratio is obtained by dividing its capital baseby its risk-weighted assets. Differences Between the Risk-Based Capital Guidelines and the ExistingCapital Standard The following sections describe in greater detail the three areas in whichthe risk-based capital guidelines differ from the existing capital standard.<ITAG tagnum="81">I. Assets are Risk-Weighted </ITAG>Under the risk-based capital guidelines, assets are placed into one offour risk categories, based primarily on credit risk. To calculate a bank'sminimum risk-based capital requirement, the face value of assets in eachrisk category is adjusted to reflect the relative riskiness of that category.For example, assets in the first risk category, which includes cash, reservesat Federal Reserve Banks, and securities issued by the U.S. Government,have no credit risk and therefore carry a 0% risk-weight and require nocapital. Capital is required for assets in the remaining three risk categories.Capital is required for 20, 50, or 100 percent of the asset's face value,depending on the risk category in which the asset is placed. For example,an asset with a 20% risk weight requires only one-fifth the capital supportof an asset with a 100% risk-weight. The asset risk weights for specificitems are presented in Table 1 of Appendix A to 12 CFR Part 3. <ITAG tagnum="81">II. Off-Balance Sheet Activities are Included </ITAG>The second change from the existing capital standard is that the finalrisk-based capital guidelines take account of the credit risk exposurethat results from off-balance sheet activities. The OCC followed the CookeCommittee framework in the treatment of off-balance sheet items. Because of the contingent nature of off-balance sheet items, the guidelinestake a two-step approach. In the first step, the face value of each off-balancesheet instrument is converted into an amount that permits it to be relatedto an on-balance sheet asset in terms of credit risk. This quantity isreferred to as the instrument's ``credit-risk equivalent'' and is calculatedby multiplying the notional principal amount of the off-balance sheet instrumentby a credit conversion factor. For example, a standby letter of credit serving as a financial guaranteeexposes a bank to the same amount of credit risk as a loan to that customer.Therefore, it is assigned a credit conversion factor of 100%. Other off-balancesheet instruments entail less credit risk and, therefore, are assignedlower conversion factors_some as low as 0%. In the second step, the credit-risk equivalent is placed into one of thefour risk categories, based upon the obligor, collateral, or guaranteeinvolved. For example, an off-balance sheet instrument with a credit conversionfactor of 50% that is issued to an obligor who falls into the 50% riskcategory would require capital against 25% of the face amount of the instrument.The credit conversion factors are listed in Table 2 of Appendix A. Themethod for calculating the credit-risk equivalents for interest and exchangerate contracts is shown in Table 3 of Appendix A. <ITAG tagnum="81">III. Capital is Redefined</ITAG>These final risk-based capital guidelines also redefine capital. The elementsof the new definition of capital are listed in Table 4 of Appendix A.Capital instruments are divided into two tiers. Core (Tier 1) capital includescommon equity, noncumulative perpetual preferred stock (excluding auctionrate issues), and minority interests that are held by others in a bank'sconsolidated subsidiaries. Supplementary (Tier 2) capital includes, amongother items, cumulative and limited-life preferred stock, mandatory convertiblesecurities, subordinated debt, and the allowance for loan and lease losses.Tier 2 capital elements qualify as part of a bank's total capital baseup to a maximum of 100% of that bank's Tier 1 capital.Some Tier 2 capital elements, however, are subject to additional limitations.The loan loss reserve is limited to 1.25% of risk-weighted assets. Termsubordinated debt and intermediate-term limited-life preferred stock aresubject to a combined limit of 50% of Tier 1 capital. Moreover, these latterinstruments, as well as other limited-life capital instruments, are amortizedover the last five years of their term. Thus, for example, term subordinateddebt with less than a year to maturity does not qualify as capital at all.Further, some assets are deducted from capital. Intangibles, includinggoodwill, are deducted from Tier 1 capital unless they meet certain criteria.One exception is goodwill acquired through supervisory mergers of problemor failed depository institutions. The application of this exception isdecided on a case-by-case basis and banks are made aware of the propertreatment of goodwill in conjunction with the OCC's merger approval. Incontrast, majority investments in unconsolidated banking or finance subsidiariesare deducted from total capital. The Basle Agreement also requires thededuction of intentional reciprocal holdings of capital instruments bybanks.Transition Period and Minimum Capital RequirementsThe final risk-based capital guidelines require banks to hold a minimumtotal risk-based capital ratio of 8% as of December 31, 1992. Of this 8%,half must be comprised of Tier 1 capital. However, a transition periodis provided, beginning on December 31, 1990 and ending on December 30,1992. No formal risk-based capital standard will be set prior to December31, 1990. On that date, banks will be required to meet an interim minimumtotal risk-based capital ratio of 7.25%.Banks should immediately begin monitoring their risk-based capital ratiosand working toward achieving the interim and final minimum ratios. In thenear future, the OCC will be providing guidance to assist banks in makinga preliminary estimate of their risk-based capital ratio. In particular,a worksheet will be distributed that will assist small banks with lesscomplex balance sheets in determining their conformance with the guidelines.Any bank that has risk-based ratios of less than 4% Tier 1 capital and8% total capital should begin planning for achieving those standards byDecember 31, 1992 as well as the interim ratio of 7.25% by December 31,1990. Furthermore, banks that at present have risk-based capital in excessof the 8% minimum should not take any action which would cause their risk-basedcapital ratio to fall below 8%.During the transition period, there will be exceptions to the limitationson the use of Tier 2 capital instruments. In addition, some elements ofcapital will be grandfathered during the transition. Descriptions of theexceptions to the capital limitations and the grandfathered elements ofcapital are contained in section 4 of the final guidelines.The OCC stresses that the 8% risk-based capital ratio is a minimum, andthat most banks will be expected to maintain risk-based capital levelsthat exceed the 8% minimum. This ratio is considered a minimum because,while the risk-based capital standard focuses primarily on credit risk,a bank's capital base must also be available to absorb losses stemmingfrom other types of risk, such as interest rate risk, operational risk,and asset concentrations. Therefore, the OCC will continue to assess boththe quality of risk management systems and the level of overall risk inindividual banks through the supervisory process, and will require additionalcapital when warranted. In addition, work will continue within the CookeCommittee on developing a common approach to assessing interest rate riskand exchange rate risk.The OCC's assessment of overall capital adequacy takes into account theseand other risks and involves a qualitative judgment made in conjunctionwith the OCC's supervision of national banks. This assessment involvesanalysis of the quality and level of earnings, the quality of loans andinvestments, the effectiveness of loan and investment policies, and management'soverall ability to monitor and control risk. Thus, the assessment of abanking organization's capital adequacy goes far beyond a simple risk-basedcapital ratio. Nevertheless, the risk-based ratio provides bankers andexaminers an important benchmark or starting point for the analysis ofcapital adequacy.Proposed Leverage ConstraintIn the near future, the OCC intends to propose amendments to its currentleverage ratios in 12 CFR Part 3. If adopted, a minimum capital-to-totalassets requirement (leverage constraint) will continue to be containedin 12 CFR Part 3. The proposed amendments would make the definition ofcapital in Part 3 consistent with that of the risk-based capital guidelines.In this respect, it is anticipated that the proposed leverage constraintwill be based solely on a ratio of Tier 1 capital to total assets. Theseamendments to the existing capital requirements will provide a minimumlevel of capital below which no national bank may operate without a mandateto restore capital to an adequate level. Because of the redefinition ofcapital in the new leverage constraint, it is difficult to compare thecurrent requirements to the new standard. However, it is anticipated thatthis new minimum leverage ratio will be lower than the current standard.An amended form of the existing minimum capital requirements is being retainedfor two reasons. First, the risk-based capital guidelines are designedsolely as a measure of credit risk; therefore, there are a number of otherbanking risks that are not addressed_<T3>e.g., </T3>interest rate risk, operational risk and asset concentrations.Second, the existing capital requirement is based upon total rather thanrisk-adjusted assets, and therefore, eliminates the possibility for significantleverage which exists under the risk-based capital guidelines. This possibilityexists because some assets receive a 0% risk weight under the guidelinesand therefore require no capital.The OCC believes that the combination of risk-based capital and the leverageconstraint should produce a level of capital that adequately protects banksagainst losses. However, it is the opinion of the OCC that a bank's capitalrequirement should be related to the riskiness of its assets and off-balancesheet activities and, therefore, that the risk-based standard should bethe primary focus in determining the adequacy of a bank's capital.If adopted, the proposed amendments to 12 CFR Part 3 would become effectiveon December 31, 1990. In the interim, banks should maintain capital inaccordance with the requirements for primary and total capital containedin the existing provisions of 12 CFR Part 3. In other words, until December31, 1990, the capital requirements of national banks will not change; afterDecember 31, 1990, if the proposed amendments are adopted, banks will berequired to maintain a minimum capital ratio computed as a percentage oftotal assets, in addition to complying with the provisions of the risk-basedcapital guidelines.Except for a few minor, mostly technical changes, the OCC's InterpretiveRuling 3.100 (<T3>See</T3> 12 CFR 3.100), which interprets the statutory phrase ``capitaland surplus'' will remain unchanged. Thus, the proposed amendments to 12CFR Part 3 would have no effect on a bank's lending limit or other activitiesthat are statutorily constrained by the amount of a bank's ``capital andsurplus.''Summary of the Comment Letters and Changes from the Proposed GuidelinesThe final guidelines include a number of changes from the proposed guidelineswhich appeared at 53 FR 8550, March 15, 1988. These changes were influenced,in part, by letters received during the comment period, which ended May13, 1988.The OCC received 122 comment letters, including 46 from multinational andregional banks and 25 from community banks. The remaining commenters weretrade associations, investment bankers, government-sponsored agencies,Members of Congress, multilateral lending institutions, savings and loanassociations, and various other groups representing the financial servicesindustry.The commenters discussed a number of issues, some of which precipitatedchanges to the final guidelines. The major issues regarding risk-basedcapital and the changes from the original proposal are discussed in theremainder of this preamble. The most significant changes from the proposedguidelines are: the assignment of certain mortgage loans to the 50% riskcategory; the elimination of the 10% risk category; the recognition ofnoncumulative perpetual preferred stock as a Tier 1 capital instrument;the expansion of the treatment of intangible assets; and the recognitionof a group of industrialized countries whose central governments and banksshould receive similar treatment under the risk-based capital system. Theseand other issues are discussed more fully below, and are arranged alphabeticallywithin the following categories: I. General Issues, II. Balance Sheet Assets,III. Off-Balance Sheet Items, and IV. Capital Elements.<ITAG tagnum="81">I. General Issues</ITAG><T3>Applicability</T3>_The proposed guidelines stated that the risk-basedcapital guidelines were intended to apply to all national banks, regardlessof size. Although a number of the commenters expressed their agreementwith that position, 11 suggested that the guidelines should apply onlyto larger banks. Commenters suggested a number of cutoffs based on assetsize. The commenters' basic argument in support of exempting smaller banksfrom the risk-based capital guidelines was that the resultant reportingburden for those institutions would far outweigh any benefits that mightbe realized.Although the OCC acknowledges this concern, the OCC believes that the risk-basedcapital guidelines should be applied to banks of all sizes. The risk-basedcapital measure is sensitive to the credit risk profiles of individualinstitutions and therefore, it represents an important element of the capitaladequacy assessment process, regardless of a bank's size.The OCC desires to minimize the reporting burden for those institutionswith very strong risk-based capital ratios. For that reason, the proposalrequested specific comment on the appropriate focus, based on asset size,of off-site data collection and monitoring efforts for risk-based capital.The comments received in response to that question will be given carefulconsideration during the process of developing the reporting and monitoringprocedures. The details of those arrangements will be provided at a laterdate.<T3>Average versus Period-end Figures</T3>_The OCC requested specific commentregarding whether average or period-end figures should be used in calculatingthe ratio. The proposed guidelines asked three questions: ``(1) Shouldthe ratio be calculated for average figures? (2) For which items used incalculating the ratio are average figures most important? (3) How can theburden involved in determining average figures be minimized?''The OCC received 31 comments responding to these questions. While mostagreed that average figures are philosophically better, the general sentimentwas that the benefit gained by using average figures would not outweighsthe reporting burden. Several commenters said that the fear of ``windowdressing'' is overstated and that the examination process is sufficientto monitor this type of distortion.The OCC recognizes the reporting burden that would be created by requiringthe use of average figures for the calculation of the risk-based capitalratio. Therefore, period-end numbers will be used under these final guidelines,and issues such as ``window dressing'' will be addressed through the supervisoryprocess. However, the final guidelines do permit the OCC to require a bankto compute its risk-based capital ratio on the basis of average, ratherthan period-end, risk-weighted assets in response to specific supervisoryconcerns.The OCC believes that a risk-based capital ratio based upon average datais superior to one based upon period-end figures. It is the intention ofthe OCC ultimately to incorporate the use of average data in the risk-basedcapital calculation, and banks are urged to develop systems that will providethis information.<T3>Original versus Residual Maturity</T3>_In the proposed guidelines,the OCC requested specific comment regarding claims on foreign banks andloan commitments. The issue was whether these items should be risk-weightedbased upon their original or residual maturity. Thirty-six commenters werestrongly in favor of using residual maturity. Most focused on loan commitments,and argued that there is no direct relationship between maturity aloneand the likelihood of a drawdown under an outstanding commitment. Twelvecommenters asserted that the use of original maturity would require thedevelopment of new reporting systems, which would be an onerous and costlytask.After careful consideration of this issue, the OCC has determined thatwhile it is appropriate to risk-weight claims on foreign banks on the basisof residual maturity, loan commitments should be risk-weighted accordingto their original maturity. It is the OCC's considered opinion that thelonger the term of a commitment, the greater the risk of deteriorationof the credit. In this light, original maturity is viewed as the most accuratemeans of assessing the inherent riskiness of a loan commitment for purposesof risk-based capital.The OCC recognizes that many bank reporting systems do not currently reflectthe original maturity of loan commitments. Therefore, until December 31,1992, national banks will be permitted to use remaining maturity in determiningthe appropriate credit conversion factor for off-balance sheet loan commitments.This transitional rule is intended to provide all national banks with sufficientopportunity to make any necessary systems modifications.<T3>Tandem Ratios</T3>_The proposal raised the possibility that the existingminimum capital requirements in 12 CFR Part 3 would not be replaced infavor of the risk-based capital guidelines, but rather would be supplementedby the new standard. Further, the proposed guidelines stated that if aleverage constraint should be retained, the definition of capital wouldbe modified to be consistent with the one contained in the guidelines.Sixteen commenters discussed whether the current capital requirements shouldremain in place alongside the new risk-based capital standard_<T3>i.e.</T3>, whether there should be ``tandem capital ratios,'' withone being calculated as a percentage of total assets and the other basedon a bank's risk-weighted assets. The majority of those commenters feltthat the existing requirements should be phased out as quickly as possibleto avoid what could be a burdensome system that might decrease the risk-reducingincentives offered by the risk-based capital system.After careful consideration, the OCC has determined that it is best toretain some form of leverage constraint. The risk-based capital ratio isbased strictly on credit risk, and thus might understate the amount ofcapital needed to safeguard a bank against its overall risk exposure. Forexample, the risk-based capital guidelines place some assets in a 0% riskcategory and create the possibility for significant leverage. The OCC isof the opinion that the guidelines should be the primary focus of the capitaladequacy determination; however, the OCC also believes that any bankingactivity entails some risk, thereby requiring a certain base level of capital.In this regard, the OCC intends to propose amendments to 12 CFR Part 3_itsexisting minimum capital requirement. The amendments, if adopted, wouldcreate a definition of capital that is identical to the definition in AppendixA to Part 3. It is anticipated that the proposed amendments to 12 CFR Part3 will require all banks to maintain a minimum level of capital computedas a percentage of total assets, regardless of the bank's risk-based capitalratio. It is likely that the new leverage ratio will be lower than thecurrent standard. If adopted, the proposed amendments would be effectiveon December 31, 1990, the same time the risk-based capital guidelines gointo place. In the interim, all banks are required to maintain capitalin accordance with the current provisions of Part 3 relating to primaryand total capital.<ITAG tagnum="81">II. Balance Sheet Assets</ITAG><T3>Claims on Foreign Banks</T3>_Under the proposed guidelines, claimson foreign banks with an original maturity of one year or less were placedin the 20% risk category; longer-term claims were placed in the 100% riskcategory. This treatment of longer-term claims on foreign banks suggestedgreater credit and/or transfer risk than similar claims on domestic banks.Comments on this issue were received from ten of the nation's largest banksand three trade associations. All commenters resoundingly favored reducingthe weight on longer term claims on foreign banks to 20%, at least forbanks domiciled in countries that are parties to the Basle Agreement. Mostcommenters pointed out that the disparate treatment of foreign and domesticclaims (the proposal placed all claims on domestic banks in the 20% riskcategory) was a departure from the earlier U.S./U.K. proposal, and wascontradictory to the aim of the Basle Agreement, <T3>i.e., </T3>establishing a level playing field for all internationalbanks. In addition, the commenters felt that the adoption of parallel capitalstandards in each of the participating countries should narrow any perceiveddifferences in the creditworthiness of foreign banks.Several commenters suggested that by weighting longer-term claims on foreignbanks five times more heavily than similar claims on domestic banks, theproposal implied that a long-term transaction with a prime European bankis more risky than an identical transaction with any domestic bank. Asa result of this weighting disparity, the commenters claimed that bankswould pay a higher price (in the form of increased capital) to transactbusiness with foreign counterparties. The majority of the commenters feltthat this would create an artificial incentive for banks to engage in transactionswith domestic banks to the exclusion of foreign banks.According to the commenters, a major consequence of this bias against foreignbanks would be its effect on international funding markets. Interbank dealingsin the global market would be unnecessarily disrupted and each nation'sbanking system would become more isolated. Barriers to the free flow ofinternational funds would discourage healthy diversification and reduceimportant funding sources.The commenters also noted that the proposed treatment of longer-term claimson foreign banks differs from the way in which the risk-based capital guidelineshandle the loan portfolio, which is not weighted according to maturityor degree of transfer risk.The OCC agreed with the majority of the commenters' conclusions and hasdrafted the final guidelines so as to avoid the problems created by placinga high risk weight on long-term claims on all foreign banks. Using theterm ``OECD-based country,'' which is defined in section 1(c)(15) of AppendixA \2\<NOTE/> and is derived from the Basle Agreement, the final guidelinesplace a 20% risk weight on all claims on or guaranteed by a depositoryinstitution organized in one of these countries. Claims on depository institutionsthat are not organized in an OECD country are also placed in the 20% riskcategory if they have a remaining maturity of one year or less: otherwise,claims on or guaranteed by non-OECD depository institutions are placedin the 100% risk category. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ The term ``OECD-based country'' as defined in section1(c)(15) of Appendix A, currently includes Australia, Austria, Belgium,Canada, Denmark, Finland, France, Germany, Greece, Iceland, Ireland, Italy,Japan, Luxembourg, Netherlands, New Zealand, Norway, Portugal, Spain, Sweden,Switzerland, Turkey, United Kingdom, and United States, plus Saudi Arabia.These countries are hereinafter referred to as ``OECD countries''.<T3>Claims on Foreign Governments</T3>_Three commenters addressed the proposedtreatment of claims on foreign governments. The proposal placed local currencyclaims on foreign central governments, to the extent the bank has localcurrency liabilities, in the 20% risk category. All other claims on foreigngovernments were deemed to entail and element of transfer risk and, therefore,were placed in the 100% risk category. Comments on this issue were receivedfrom two banks and a trade association.Both of the banks felt that, at least for many countries, the level oftransfer risk was insufficient to warrant placement in the 100% risk category.One bank further suggested that this treatment would result in competitiveinequalities for U.S. banks when the European Common Market begins reciprocaltreatment among European Economic Community banks. One bank proposed assigningall claims of central governments that are members of the Bank for InternationalSettlements to the 20% risk category. The other bank recommended the developmentof a list of countries with assigned weightings, or the establishment ofsimple criteria from which a credit distinction could be drawn. The tradeassociation responded in favor of the 100% risk weight, because they werepleased that claims on governments of industrialized countries were assignedan equal risk weighting with that of domestic commercial and industrialloans.In accordance with the Basle Agreement, the OCC's final guidelines giveidentical treatment to all claims on OECD countries, as that term is definedin section 1(c)(15) of the final guidelines. As an example, securitiesissued by the central government of an OECD country receive a 0% risk weight.This grouping of countries was chosen because it was felt that claims onthese industrialized nations entail very little transfer risk. For countriesoutside the grouping, direct claims on their central governments and centralbanks, with a remaining maturity of one year or less, also are placed inthe 0% risk category, to the extent they are denominated in the local currencyand funded by local currency liabilities. Claims backed with a full faithand credit guarantee from the central government or central bank of a non-OECDcountry are also assigned to the 0% risk category if they meet these criteria.Otherwise, claims on the central government of a non-OECD country are assignedto the 100% risk category. Claims on the central bank of a non-OECD countrythat do not meet the criteria for assignment of a 0% risk weight are placedin the 20% risk category if the remaining maturity is one year or less,and the 100% risk category if the remaining maturity exceeds one year.<T3>Financial Guarantee Insurance</T3>_The proposal placed claims guaranteedby domestic depository institutions in the 20% risk category. Generallyspeaking, this means that claims otherwise belonging in the 50% or 100%risk category which are supported by a financial guarantee-type standbyletter of credit from an OECD depository institution are placed in the20% risk category. Municipalities are among those entities whose obligationsare traditionally backed by bank-issued standby letters of credit. Theconcessionary weight given to claims guaranteed by a bank is particularlyimportant with municipal revenue bonds, which are otherwise placed in the50% risk category; however, if a municipal revenue bond is supported bya standby letter of credit, it receives a 20% risk weight. Municipal revenuebonds frequently are supported by municipal bond insurance, rather thana standby letter of credit. Under the risk-based capital proposal, thefact that a municipal revenue bond is supported by financial guaranteeinsurance would not entitle it to preferential treatment.The OCC received eight comment letters from entities in the municipal bondinsurance business_seven insurance companies and one trade association.All eight of the commenters argued for similar treatment for municipalrevenue bonds supported by financial guaranty insurance and municipal revenuebonds supported by standby letters of credit.Several commenters pointed out that financial guarantee insurers receiveratings from national credit rating organizations, and that virtually allinsurers receive the highest rating possible. Commenters suggested thatthe rating of the financial guarantor be incorporated into the risk weighting,and that only instruments guaranteed by insurers with the highest ratingbe placed in the 20% risk category.After careful consideration of this issue, the OCC has decided not to givepreferential risk weights to any guarantees or other commitments by privatesector entities, other than depository institutions. Although a numberof bank investments receive credit ratings, the risk-based capital guidelinesare not presently designed to incorporate this type of credit allocation.Nevertheless, the OCC is sympathetic to the concerns raised by the factthat highly-rated insurers are not given preferential treatment in theguidelines and will work toward eradicating any inequities that arise fromthe disparate treatment.<T3>Weight on Municipal Securities</T3>_Fifteen commenters, including commentersfrom the financial guarantee insurance industry discussed above, addressedthe proposed risk categories for municipal securities. Seven commentersdiscussed the risk categories to which obligations of state and local governmentswere assigned, irrespective of any credit enhancement devices. Virtuallyall of the commenters agreed that 20% is the proper risk category for generalobligations; however, several commenters objected to the placement of revenuebonds in the 50% risk category, claiming that neither the market nor thecredit rating services make such a wide distinction.The credit quality of a revenue bond is limited by the ability of the issuerto collect revenues from the project financed. Therefore, the OCC has retainedthe distinction between general obligations and revenue bonds. Risk categoriesare very broad measures of credit risk and should not be viewed as fine-tuneddeterminations of the riskiness of a particular asset or off-balance sheetactivity. <T3>Weight on Residential Mortgages</T3>_The proposed guidelines placedresidential mortgages in the 100% risk category. This proposed weight representeda departure from the Basle Agreement, which placed residential mortgagesin the 50% risk category. The departure resulted from the OCC's concernthat a lower risk weight for residential mortgages might be preceived ascredit allocation within the loan portfolio. Forty-two commenters addressed this issue. The majority advocated assigningresidential mortgages to a lower risk category, and justified this positionby citing the superior credit quality of residential mortgages. Commenters also stated that a 100% risk weight for residential mortgageswould place U.S. banks at a competitive disadvantage. This disadvantagewould result because, under the terms of the Basle Agreement, foreign bankswould hold half as much capital against residential mortgages as U.S. banks.Commenters pointed out that national banks compete with foreign depositoryinstitutions in both overseas and domestic real estate markets. In addition, a number of commenters felt that domestic competitors fromthe thrift industry would have an edge, as savings and loans are generallyallowed to operate with less capital than national banks. Commenters statedthat this competitive disadvantage could ultimately have an adverse effecton the U.S. housing market. While the OCC is still concerned about creating the perception of allocatingcredit within the loan portfolio, the agency agrees that a competitivedisadvantage could result if national banks were required to hold morecapital against residential mortgages than their competitors. The OCC furtherrecognizes that a competitive disadvantage such as this could ultimatelyhave an adverse impact on U.S. consumers. It is for these reasons thatthe OCC has decided to place residential mortgages in the 50% risk category.In order to ensure that residential mortgages which are placed in the 50%risk category deserve this preferential treatment, the OCC has decidedto require that these assets meet certain prudential qualifications beforereceiving a 50% risk weight. Thus, the mortgage must be a first lien ona one-to-four-family residential property. The residence may be rentedor owner-occupied. The note secured by the mortgage must not be more than90 days past due, on nonaccrual or restructured. The assignment of mortgagesto the 50% risk category is based upon the presumption that banks willadhere to prudent underwriting standards with respect to the maximum loan-to-valueratio, the borrower's paying capacity and the long-term expectations forthe real estate market in which it is lending. If, in the course of thesupervisory process, it is determined that a bank has failed to do this,the OCC may require additional capital, increased reserves, or both. Inall cases, residential property loans made for purposes of constructionfinancing do not qualify for the 50% risk weight; however, this exclusionfrom the 50% risk category does not apply to loans made to individual purchasersfor the construction of their own homes. The proposed guidelines did not address the treatment of mortgage-backedsecurities. However, after careful consideration the OCC has decided totreat such instruments as if the bank has an interest in the underlyingpool of mortgages. For mortgage-backed securities issued by governmentor government-sponsored agencies, the security is assigned to the riskcategory appropriate for a claim on the issuing entity, assuming the issuingagency guarantees the timely repayment of principal and interest. The guidelinesset forth certain criteria that a mortgage-backed security must meet beforeit can be assigned to any risk category lower than 100%. Privately-issued mortgaged-backed securities that meet the above-mentionedcriteria are assigned to the highest risk category appropriate for anyone of the underlying mortgages or securities in the pool. The OCC may,on a case-by-case basis, allow a bank to assign the security to the variousrisk categories in proportion to the respective risk weights that makeup the security_that is, the security may be separated into its componentsfor purposes of risk weighting. In order for a bank to proportionatelyrisk weight a mortgage-backed security, it must obtain the necessary dataon the underlying pool as of each reporting date. This information mustbe available to the bank for use in preparing the Report of Condition.If current data is unavailable, the entire security must be assigned tothe highest risk weight appropriate for any underlying mortgage or security,based on the original or last-known composition of the pool. Any class of a mortgage-backed security that, in the event of loss of principalor interest, incurs more than its pro rata share of loss without the wholemortgage-backed security issue being in default (<T3>e.g., </T3>subordinated classes or residual interests) is to be assigneda risk weight of 100%. Furthermore, all stripped mortgage-backed securities,<T3>i.e., </T3>interest only portions (IOs), principal only portions (POs),and similar instruments, are assigned to the 100% risk category, regardlessof the issuer. While the OCC recognizes that these instruments can be usedto hedge interest rate risk and does not wish to discount their appropriateuse for this purpose, IOs and POs are assigned to the highest risk categorybecause of their extreme price volatility, market risk, and otherwise inherentriskiness as a bank asset. As a measure for interest rate risk is perfected,the OCC may reconsider the assignment of these instruments to the 100%risk category. <T3>Weight on Obligations of U.S. Government-sponsored Agencies</T3>_Inthe proposal, the OCC requested specific comment on the treatment of obligationsof U.S. Government-sponsored agencies. These obligations include claimson, and portions of claims guaranteed by, U.S. Government-sponsored agencies,as well as claims collateralized with securities issued or guaranteed byU.S. Government-sponsored agencies. The proposed guidelines placed theseobligations in the 20% risk category, a change from the previous proposalat 52 FR 23045, June 17, 1987, which placed obligations of U.S. Government-sponsoredagencies in the 50% risk category.Thirty-one commenters responded on this issue. While a number supportedthe proposed risk weight, the majority felt that the risk weight was tohigh. They stated that there should be no distinction between obligationsof U.S. Government-sponsored agencies and obligations of the U.S. Government,because the former have the implied faith and credit of the U.S. Government.A number of commenters particularly objected to the distinction betweenobligations of the Federal National Mortgage Association (FNMA) and theFederal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (FHLMC), both of which are U.S.Government-sponsored agencies, and obligations of the Government NationalMortgage Association (GNMA), which are guaranteed by the U.S. Government.These commenters claimed that such a distinction could have a negativeeffect on the housing markets. After careful consideration of this issue as well as the proposed maturitybreak for claims on the U.S. Government, the OCC has determined that obligationsof U.S. Government-sponsored agencies should remain in the 20% risk category.However, the 10% risk category has been eliminated and all obligationscollateralized by securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S. Governmentor one of its agencies have been moved into the 20% category. This categoryalso encompasses indirect holdings of pools of assets that represent directclaims on the U.S. Government and its agencies, <T3>e.g., </T3>mutual funds and privately-issued mortgage-backed securitieswhere the underlying assets are GNMA securities. <T3>Weight on U.S. Government Securities</T3>_The proposed guidelines placedU.S. Government securities with a remaining maturity of 91 days or lessin the 0% risk category and longer term U.S. Government securities in the10% risk category. Fourteen commenters addressed this issue. Several supportedthe proposed weights, while the majority argued that no maturity distinctionshould be made. These commenters noted that U.S. Government securitiescarry no credit risk and, since the proposal does not address interestrate risk in general, it is inappropriate to do so for U.S. Governmentsecurities. After careful consideration of this issue, the OCC has placed all claimson or directly and unconditionally guaranteed by the U.S. Government andits agencies in the 0% risk category, regardless of maturity. This categorywould generally include all securities guaranteed by the U.S. Governmentor its agencies, including GNMA pass-through securities. Furthermore, theOCC has determined that it is appropriate to eliminate the 10% categoryaltogether. Thus, portions of claims conditionally guaranteed or collateralizedby securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S. Government or its agenciesare included in the 20% risk category. This includes, for example, repurchaseagreements, loans guaranteed by the Veterans Administration, and studentloans on which the Department of Education acts as a reinsurer. Indirectholdings of direct claims on the U.S. Government and its agencies, <T3>e.g., </T3>mutual funds and mortgage-backed securities, are also includedin the 20% risk category. Although a bank's interest rate risk profile is an important and appropriatesupervisory concern, the OCC recognizes that the proposed treatment oflonger-term U.S. Government securities did not fully address the conceptof interest rate risk. Therefore, the OCC will continue to monitor interestrate risk through the supervisory process, and may require additional capitalif warranted. In addition, work will continue within the Cooke Committeeon developing a common approach to assessing interest rate risk.<ITAG tagnum="81">III. Off-Balance Sheet Items </ITAG><T3>Credit Card Lines</T3>_Under the proposed guidelines, unused creditcard lines were deemed to be short-term commitments with a 0% credit conversionfactor, if the bank has the unconditional option to cancel the card atany time. Four commenters addressed this issue. The commenters recommendedthat, in addition to credit card lines, other open-end retail credit arrangementswith similar characteristics be included in this category. The OCC agrees that it is the nature of the credit line, rather than theactual device used to access the line, that should be used as the determinantfor application of the risk-based capital guidelines. Therefore, the OCChas expanded the definition of credit card lines in section 3(b)(4)(iii)to include other related plans. Examples of arrangements that might beencompassed by this definition are overdraft checking plans and creditadvances under a credit card plan accessed by check. Commenters also recommended that open-end retail credit arrangements shouldreceive a conversion factor of 0% to the extent they are unconditionallycancellable ``in accordance with applicable law.'' In an effort to avoidinequities that could arise in states that have notice requirements beforesuch credit arrangements can be cancelled, the OCC has adopted the recommendedphraseology. However, to the extent state law makes open-end retail creditarrangements practically uncancellable, these items will be treated aslong-term commitments and receive a credit conversion factor of 50%. <T3>Interest Rate and Exchange Rate Contracts</T3>_Commenters addressedseveral different subjects within this issue:(1) Risk Weights. Under the proposed guidelines, risk weights for interestrate and exchange rate contracts are determined by a two-step process.First, the notional principal amount of the item is converted into a balancesheet equivalent measure that approximates the amount of credit exposureinvolved. Second, the resulting credit equivalent amount is assigned toan appropriate risk category, based primarily on the identity of the counterparty,or where relevant, on the nature of the guarantee or the underlying collateral.However, the proposed guidelines specified that the maximum risk weightassigned to the credit equivalent amount of an interest rate or exchangerate contract is 50%, rather than 100% as previously stated at 52 FR 23045,June 17, 1987.The OCC requested specific comment on the change. Seventeen commentersexpressed their support for reducing the maximum risk weight for thesecontracts from 100% to 50%. However, three commenters felt that 50% wasstill overly harsh and suggested making the 20% risk category the maximumfor all counterparties. Other commenters called for a 20% risk categoryfor all contracts with foreign and domestic banks, regardless of maturity.After careful consideration of the comments received on this subject, theOCC has extended the 20% risk category to include all claims, includinginterest rate and exchange rate contracts, on depository institutions incorporatedin OECD countries. The OCC has incorporated this change in section 3(a)(2)(i)of the final guidelines.(2) Netting. The proposed guidelines did not permit multiple contractswith a single counterparty to be netted in the calculation of risk-weightedcredit equivalents for interest rate and foreign exchange rate contracts.Seventeen commenters argued that the practice has been sufficiently affirmedby legal opinions to merit recognition in the risk-based capital guidelines.After consideration of the comments, the OCC has revised section 3(b)(5)(i)of the final guidelines to permit netting of multiple contracts with asingle counterparty if they are subject to novation. This change encompassesonly those contracts under which the gross obligations are replaced inlaw and fact by a single net obligation. In the future, the OCC, in conjunctionwith the other members of the Cooke Committee, may consider recognizingother forms of netting when their enforceability in bankruptcy proceedingsis supported by authoritative legal opinions.(3) Exempted Transactions. The proposed guidelines permitted banks to excludeexchange rate contracts with an original maturity of seven days or lessfrom the calculation of the denominator of the risk-based capital ratio.The Cooke Committee subsequently agreed to extend this maturity cutoffto 14 calendar days. Although the OCC did not receive any specific commentson this issue, section 3(b)(5)(iv)(A) of the final guidelines was amendedto give national banks the benefit of this concession.<T3>Loan Strips</T3>_Several commenters requested clarification of thedefinition of loan strips. The OCC has done this under section 3(b)(1)(iii)of the final guidelines. The definition of loan strips has been narrowedto include only those loan strips that represent assets sold without recourse,and that mature before the underlying loan. This narrower definition excludesloan strips written such that the maturity of the transaction coincideswith the maturity of the underlying loan. This second type of loan stripis tantamount to a loan participation, and therefore is generally excludedfrom the originating bank's risk-weighted assets.<T3>Unfunded Participations</T3>_Under the proposed guidelines, lettersof credit and commitments are assigned a risk weight on an amount net ofparticipations. However, because these off-balance sheet items, as wellas the participations sold in them, are unfunded, a participation is treatedas a claim on the entity to which it was sold.Five commenters argued that requiring the selling bank to treat the participationas a claim on the entity to which it was sold results in double counting,since the purchaser is also required to hold capital against the same item.Virtually all of the commenters addressing this issue felt that the proposedtreatment would have the effect of inhibiting a constructive activity thatdiversifies risk.This treatment of unfunded participations was intended to account for thecontingency where the lead bank is called upon to advance funds to thebeneficiary/counterparty and the participant is unable to reimburse thelead bank for its share of the advance. That risk is separate and distinctfrom the counterparty risk recognized by the capital requirement for thepurchaser of the participation. Furthermore, since the initial off-balancesheet activity and the participation are unfunded, the participation canbe viewed as a guarantee of a portion of the off-balance sheet item. Thus,since claims guaranteed by depository institutions in OECD countries receivea 20% risk weight, that portion of an item which has been participatedto a depository institution in an OECD country should logically receivea risk weight of 20%. Therefore, the OCC considers the proposed treatmentreasonable.In the final analysis, even though the treatment of unfunded participationsmay not be as favorable as some commenters would wish to see, the saleof participations generally allows a lead bank to maintain less capitalagainst an item in total, than if participating interests had not beensold.Capital Elements<T3>Allowance for Loan and Lease Losses</T3>_The proposed guidelines limitedthe amount of loan and lease loss reserves that qualify as Tier 2 capitalto 1.25% of risk-weighted assets. Thirty-three commenters expressed concernthat placing a limit on the allowance for loan and lease losses would createa disincentive for prudent reserving practices. Many also suggested thatthe allowance is equivalent to equity and should be included in Tier 1rather than Tier 2.The allowance for loan and lease losses is intended to absorb future losses.Although future losses may not be identified specifically at the time aprovision is made, a presumption exists that losses are inherent in theloan and lease portfolio. The obvious link between the allowance and inherentlosses in the loan and lease portfolio precludes it from qualifying asTier 1 capital, which encompasses only the purest and most stable formsof capital. Furthermore, it is intended that the loan loss reserves whichqualify for inclusion as Tier 2 capital will be general in nature. Thatis, any portion of the allowance for loan and lease losses which is ascribedto particular assets that have been identified as possessing a reasonableprobability of some loss is not to be included as Tier 2 capital.Allocated transfer risk reserves are an obvious example of loan loss reservesthat are not general in nature and, therefore, do not qualify for inclusionas Tier 2 capital. They are reserves that have been established in accordancewith section 905(a) of the International Lending Supervision Act of 1983(12 U.S.C. 3907 and 3909) against certain assets whose value has been foundby the U.S. banking agencies to have been impaired significantly by protractedtransfer risk problems. Similarly, reserves for other real estate owned,since they are earmarked for a specific asset, do not qualify as Tier 2capital.Beyond the clearly identified specific loan loss reserves, it is difficultto distinguish between the portion of the loan loss reserve that is freelyavailable to absorb future losses within the portfolio and the portionthat reflects likely losses on existing problem or troubled loans. However,a bank that maintains a relatively large allowance for loan and lease lossesusually has a relatively greater incidence of identified asset qualityproblems in its loan and lease portfolio, and in this situation the entireallowance for loan and lease losses cannot be considered to be a true generalreserve for the purposes of risk-based capital. Therefore, a standard percentagelimitation, based on total risk-weighted assets, is the most reasonablemethod of eliminating the bulk of the non-qualifying loan loss reservesfrom banks' capital calculations. The figure of 1.25% of risk-weightedassets was determined on the basis of historical data, after making appropriateadjustments for recent experience with large reserves against exposuresto lesser-developed countries.The OCC has determined that it is prudent to limit the portion of the allowancefor loan and lease losses that may be counted as Tier 2 capital. The OCCwill continue to participate in the Cooke Committee's effort to clarifythe distinction between those portions of the allowance for loan and leaselosses which should conceptually be regarded as part of capital and thosewhich should not qualify. When a suitable definition is agreed, the OCCwill reconsider the need for a standard percentage limitation in the guidelines.Although some institutions may perceive the limit as a disincentive forprudent reserving practices, every national bank must still maintain anadequate allowance for loan and lease losses. The OCC will continue toenforce the standards for reserve adequacy on a case-by-case basis throughthe supervisory process.Several commenters requested clarification of the treatment of the portionof the allowance for loan and lease losses that does not qualify as Tier2 capital. In response to those inquiries, a footnote has been added tosection 2(b)(1) of the final guidelines stating that any excess reserves,as well as allocated transfer risk reserves and reserves held against otherreal estate owned, are deducted from the gross sum of risk-weighted assetsin computing the denominator of the risk-based capital ratio.<T3>Goodwill and Other Intangibles</T3>_Under the proposed guidelines,all goodwill and other intangible assets were deducted from capital, withthe exception of purchased mortgage servicing rights and certain goodwillacquired in connection with supervisory mergers with problem or failedbanks. This treatment was similar to the OCC's existing capital-to-totalassets requirements under 12 CFR Part 3, which includes only purchasedmortgage servicing rights within the definition of primary capital.Thirty-eight commenters addressed this issue. Most focused strictly ongoodwill and all firmly supported the inclusion of goodwill, or at a minimumcertain intangibles, in the proposed definition of capital. Several commentersrecommended that intangible assets be included within the definition ofcapital, but limited to a certain percentage of Tier 1 capital. Strongarguments were given by a number of banks for the permanent grandfatheringof existing goodwill. Commenters also urged that the OCC address thesematters in a manner consistent with the Federal Reserve and the FDIC.Intangible assets represent the excess of the purchase price over the fairmarket value of assets acquired in acquisitions accounted for under thepurchase method of accounting. The excess amount is first allocated toidentifiable intangibles (such as mortgage servicing rights, favorableleaseholds, and core deposit intangibles), with the remainder accountedfor as goodwill.The true market value of intangible assets is often difficult to ascertain,as it involves a number of assumptions which are subject to changes ingeneral economic circumstances or to changes in an individual institution'sfuture prospects. Experience has shown that the value of many intangiblesdeclines when the condition of a bank deteriorates, the most critical pointat which capital is needed. It is because of this inherent weakness inthe value of certain intangibles that goodwill and most intangible assetscannot be relied upon for capital support, and therefore are not countedin the determination of capital adequacy. The OCC recognizes that not all intangibles possess the same characteristics,and that some may be more acceptable in terms of the quality of the valuesthey represent. Mortgage servicing rights were included within the definitionof capital under the capital requirements of 12 CFR Part 3, and the proposedrisk-based capital guidelines, because they possess attributes very similarto intangible assets. The OCC has determined that, rather than list thetypes of intangibles acceptable as capital, a more appropriate method isto define those attributes which make the intangible asset a more reliablesupport for capital.In this regard, these final guidelines delineate in section 2(c)(3) thecriteria an intangible asset must meet before it qualifies as Tier 1 capital.The principal considerations in evaluating intangibles for purposes ofcapital adequacy are based on the separability, marketability and certaintyof a stream of cash flows. Furthermore, in order to limit a bank's relianceon intangibles as capital, the amount of intangible assets that qualifyas Tier 1 capital are subject to a limit of 25% of total Tier 1 capital.The criteria purposely avoid excluding by name any particular categoryof identifiable intangible. The OCC expects includable types of intangiblesto encompass most mortgage servicing rights. Banks may include other intangibleassets which meet the criteria. Goodwill does not meet the criteria andthe exclusion of goodwill from capital in consistent with the capital requirementsof the current 12 CFR Part 3. Supervisory goodwill is the one exception to these criteria, and the OCChas expanded this exception in the final guidelines to include supervisorygoodwill acquired in connection with assisted mergers with problem or faileddepository institutions. In the proposed guidelines, this exception waslimited to mergers with problem or failed banks. While the final guidelines allow banks to include a potentially greaternumber of intangible assets within the definition of capital, all intangiblesthat were grandfathered under the previous capital standard must be deductedfrom capital after the transition period ends, as detailed in section 4of the final guidelines. The OCC has determined that in view of this moreliberral treatment of intangibles, and since intangibles that fail to meetthe delineated criteria test are not reliable as a means of capital support,grandfathering of intangible assets is not justified after the transitionperiod of the new guidelines. <T3>Preferred Stock</T3>_Thirty-four commenters addressed the proposedtreatment of the various forms of preferred stock. The OCC specificallysought comment concerning the distinction between long-term and intermediate-termpreferred stock. The proposed placement of perpetual preferred stock inTier 2 capital generated a significant amount of comment. The manner inwhich the commenters discussed preferred stock was broken down into perpetualand limited-life issues.(1) Perpetual Preferred Stock. The commenters that addressed the proposal'splacement of perpetual preferred stock in Tier 2 capital argued that thoseinstruments are so close to common equity that they cannot justifiablybe relegated to the status of supplementary capital. A consistent themethroughout the comment letters was that, from a regulator's capital adequacypoint of view, perpetual preferred stock provides an equally effectivecushion against losses as does an equivalent amount of common stock. Anumber of commenters stated that Generally Accepted Accounting Principles(GAAP), bank regulations, and securities regulations have long consideredperpetual preferred stock a full-fledged component of equity.Some commenters suggested that only noncumulative perpetual preferred stockshould be allowed to qualify as Tier 1 capital. However, in arguing forthe inclusion of preferred stock in Tier 1 capital, a number of commentersstated that noncumulative preferred stock will be difficult to market andis not a viable financing vehicle for banks. Several commenters expressed concern over certain forms of variable rateperferred stock and observed that as a bank gets into trouble it has topay higher divideneds on its preferred stock. One commenter suggested thatthe problem with so-called auction rate preferred stock can be cured byrequiring that dividends on Tier 1 capital instruments be tied to somethingother than the creditworthiness of the issuer. However, according to anothercommenter, recent issues of auction rate preferred stock have containeda feature permitting the issuer to fix the dividend period at one or moreyears. In light of the comment letters and the amendments to the Basle Agreement,the OCC has determined that noncumulative perpetual preferred stock shouldbe included as Tier 1 capital. All cumulative preferred stock, as wellas those preferred stock instruments with a limited life, will continueto qualify as Tier 2 capital. All preferred stock having a dividend ratethat is periodically reset in an auction-type process to reflect the creditworthinessof the issuer_<T3>e.g.</T3>, auction rate, remarketable and money market preferred stock_isincluded as Tier 2 capital only, regardless of whether dividends are cumulativeor not. Furthermore, in order to meet the definition of perpetual preferredstock, the issue cannot be redeemed at the option of the holder of theinstrument or have other provisions that would require future redemptionof the stock. The OCC believes that noncumulative perpetual preferred stock providesa degree of capital support so similar to common stock that it should notbe excluded from Tier 1 capital. Notwithstanding commenters' argumentsfor including cumulative preferred stock in Tier 1, the OCC, the otherfederal banking agencies, and the signatories to the Basle Agreement reacheda consensus that the accumulation of dividends has the potential of beinga drain on future earnings; therefore, preferred stock instruments witha cumulative dividend feature are placed in Tier 2 capital.\3\<NOTE/> By placing cumulative preferred stock in Tier 2, Tier 1 continuesto be comprised of only the purest and most stable forms of capital. TheOCC has revised section 2 of the guidelines to specifically include certainnoncumulative preferred stock instruments in Tier 1 capital. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ This treatment of preferred stock is consistent with theFederal Reserve Board's treatment for state member banks. The Federal Reserve'srisk-based captal guidelines for bank holding companies allow certain cumulativepreferred stock in Tier 1 capital. Historically, few national banks haveused preferred stock as a source of capital; rather, the majority of thepreferred stock issuances have been accomplished at the holding companylevel. (2) Limited-Life Preferred Stock. When addressing the proposed distinctionbetween long-term and intermediate-term preferred stock, the commenterswere not as unified as they were in their response to the proposed treatmentof perpetual preferred stock. A majority of those commenters felt thatno distinction should be drawn based on the original maturity of an instrument.However, a strong minority stated that the proposed distinction was appropriate.Several commenters suggested that all limited-life preferred stock shouldbe included in Tier 2 without limit. The OCC has not changed its treatment of limited-life preferred stock instrumentsin the final guidelines; <T3>i.e.</T3>, preferred stock with an original maturity of 20 years ormore qualifies as Tier 2 capital up to 100% of Tier 1, while preferredstock with an original maturity of less than 20 years, together with termsubordinated debt, qualifies as Tier 2 capital up to 50% of Tier 1 capital.The OCC believes that this maturity distinction is a valid measure of thecapital support that the instrument provides. As proposed, all limited-lifecapital instruments are discounted in the last five years to maturity.<ITAG tagnum="84">Executive Order 12291 </ITAG>It is certified that this final rule does not constitute a ``major rule''and, therefore, does not require the preparation of a final regulatoryimpact analysis. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act </ITAG>Pursuant to section 605(b) of the Regulatory Flexibility Act, it is certifiedthat these changes will not have a significant economic impact on a substantialnumber of small entities. Accordingly, a final Regulatory Flexibility Analysisis not required. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 12 CFR Part 3 </ITAG>National banks, Capital, Risk. <ITAG tagnum="84">Authority and Issuance </ITAG>For the reasons set forth in the preamble, Part 3 of Chapter I of Title12 of the Code of Federal Regulations is amended as set fourth below. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 3_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for 12 CFR Part 3 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 12 U.S.C. 93a, 161, 1818; and 12 U.S.C. 3907 and 3909.</ITAG>2. A new Appendix A is added to Part 3 after andSection; 3.100 to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix A_Risk-Based Capital Guidelines</ITAG>Section 1. Purpose, Applicability of Guidelines, and Definitions.(a) <T3>Purpose. </T3>(1) An important function of the Office of the Comptrollerof the Currency (``OCC'') is to evaluate the adequacy of capital maintainedby each national bank. Such an evaluation involves the consideration ofnumerous factors, including the riskiness of a bank's assets and off-balancesheet items. This Appendix A implements the OCC's risk-based capital guidelines.The risk-based capital ratio derived from those guidelines is more systematicallysensitive to the credit risk associated with various bank activities thanis a capital ratio based strictly on a bank's total balance sheet assets.A bank's risk-based capital ratio is obtained by dividing its capital base(as defined in section 2 of this Appendix A) by its risk-weighted assets(as calculated pursuant to section 3 of this Appendix A). These guidelineswere created within the framework established by the report issued by theCommittee on Banking Regulations and Supervisory Practices in July 1988.The OCC believes that the risk-based capital ratio is a useful tool inevaluating the capital adequacy of all national banks, not just those thatare active in the international banking system.(2) The purpose of this Appendix A is to explain precisely (i) how a nationalbank's risk-based capital ratio is determined and (ii) how these risk-basedcapital guidelines are applied to national banks. The OCC will review theseguidelines periodically for possible adjustments commensurate with itsexperience with the risk-based capital ratio and with changes in the economy,financial markets and domestic and international banking practices.(b) <T3>Applicability. </T3>(1) The risk-based capital ratio derived from theseguidelines is an important factor in the OCC's evaluation of a bank's capitaladequacy. However, since this measure addresses only credit risk, the 8%minimum ratio should not be viewed as the level to be targeted, but ratheras a floor. The final supervisory judgment on a bank's capital adequacyis based on an individualized assessment of numerous factors, includingthose listed in 12 CFR 3.10. As a result, it may differ from the conclusiondrawn from an isolated comparison of a bank's risk-based capital ratioto the 8% minimum specified in these guidelines. In addition to the standardsestablished by these risk-based capital guidelines, all national banksmust maintain a minimum capital-to-total assets ratio in accordance withthe provisions of 12 CFR Part 3.(2) Effective December 31, 1990, these risk-based capital guidelines willapply to all national banks. In the interim, banks must maintain minimumcapital-to-total assets ratios as required by 12 CFR Part 3, and shouldbegin preparing for the implementation of these risk-based capital guidelines.In this regard, each national bank that does not currently meet the finalminimum ratio established in section 4(b)(1) of this Appendix A shouldbegin planning for achieving that standard.(3) These risk-based capital guidelines will not be applied to federalbranches and agencies of foreign banks.(c) <T3>Definitions. </T3>For purposes of this Appendix A, the following definitionsapply:(1) ``Allowances for loan and lease losses'' means the balance of the valuationreserve on December 31, 1968, plus additions to the reserve charged tooperations since that date, less losses charged against the allowance netof recoveries.(2) ``Associated company'' means any corporation, partnership, businesstrust, joint venture, association or similar organization in which a nationalbank directly or indirectly holds a 20 to 50 percent ownership interest.(3) ``Banking and finance subsidiary'' means any subsidiary of a nationalbank that engages in banking- and finance-related activities.(4) ``Cash items in the process of collection'' means checks or draftsin the process of collection that are drawn on another depository institution,including a central bank, and that are payable immediately upon presentationin the country in which the reporting bank's office that is clearing orcollecting the check or draft is located; U.S. Government checks that aredrawn on the United States Treasury or any other U.S. Government or Government-sponsoredagency and that are payable immediately upon presentation; broker's securitydrafts and commodity or bill-of-lading drafts payable immediately uponpresentation in the United States or the country in which the reportingbank's office that is handling the drafts is located; and unposted debits.(5) ``Central government'' means the national governing authority of acountry; it includes the departments, ministries and agencies of the centralgovernment. This definition does not include the following: State, provincial,or local governments; commercial enterprises owned by the central government,which are entities engaged in activities involving trade, commerce or profitthat are generally conducted or performed in the private sector of theUnited States economy; and non-central government entities whose obligationsare guaranteed by the central government.(6) ``Commitment'' means any arrangement that obligates a national bankto: (i) Purchase loans or securities; or (ii) extend credit in the formof loans or leases, participations in loans or leases, overdraft facilities,revolving credit facilities, or similar transactions.(7) ``Common stockholders' equity'' means common stock, common stock surplus,undivided profits, capital reserves, adjustments for the cumulative effectof foreign currency translation and net of unrealized losses on non-currentmarketable equity securities.(8) ``Conditional guarantee'' means a contingent obligation of the Unitedstates Government or its agencies, or the central government of an OECDcountry, the validity of which to the beneficiary is dependent upon someaffirmative action_<T3>e.g.,</T3> servicing requirements_on the part of the beneficiary ofthe guarantee or a third party.(9) ``Depository institution'' means a financial institution that engagesin the business of banking; that is recognized as a bank by the bank supervisoryor monetary authorities of the country of its incorporation and the countryof its principal banking operations; that receives deposits to a substantialextent in the regular course of business; and that has the power to acceptdemand deposits. In the U.S., this definition encompasses all federallyinsured offices of commercial banks, mutual and stock savings banks, savingsor building and loan associations (stock and mutual), cooperative banks,credit unions, and international banking facilities of domestic depositoryinstitution. Bank holding companies are excluded from this definition.For the purposes of assigning risk weights, the differentiation betweenOECD depository institutions and non-OECD depository institutions is basedon the country of incorporation. Claims on branches and agencies of foreignbanks located in the United States are to be categorized on the basis ofthe parent bank's country of incorporation.(10) ``Exchange rate contracts'' include: Cross-currency interest rateswaps; forward foreign exchange rate contracts; currency options purchased;and any similar instrument that, in the opinion of the OCC, gives riseto similar risks.(11) ``Goodwill'' means an intangible asset that represents the excessof the purchase price over the fair market value of tangible and identifiableintangible assets acquired in purchases accounted for under the purchasemethod of accounting.(12) ``Intangible assets'' include, but are not limited to, purchased mortgageand credit card servicing rights, goodwill, favorable leaseholds, and coredeposit value.(13) ``Interest rate contracts'' include: Single currency interest rateswaps; basis swaps; forward rate agreements; interest rate options purchased;forward forward deposits accepted; and any similar instrument that, inthe opinion of the OCC, gives rise to similar risks, including when-issuedsecurities.(14) ``Novation'' means a bilateral contract between two counterpartiesunder which any obligation to each other to deliver a given currency ona given date is automatically amalgamated with all other obligations forthe same currency and value date, legally substituting one single net amountfor the previous gross obligations.(15) ``OECD-based country'' means a member of the grouping of countriesthat are full members of the Organization of Economic Cooperation and Development,plus countries that have concluded special lending arrangements with theInternational Monetary Fund (IMF) associated with the IMF's General Arrangementsto Borrow. These countries are hereinafter referred to as ``OECD countries''.(16) ``Original maturity'' means, with respect to a commitment, the earliestpossible date after a commitment is made on which it expires or is unconditionallycancellable at the option of the issuing bank.(17) ``Preferred stock'' includes the following instruments: (i) ``Convertiblepreferred stock,'' which means preferred stock that is mandatorily convertibleinto either common or perpetual preferred stock; (ii) ``Intermediate-termpreferred stock,'' which means preferred stock with an original maturityof at least five years, but less than 20 years; (iii) ``Long-term preferredstock,'' which means preferred stock with an original maturity of 20 yearsor more; and (iv) ``Perpetual preferred stock,'' which means preferredstock without a fixed maturity date that cannot be redeemed at the optionof the holder, and that has no other provisions that will require futureredemption of the issue. For purposes of these instruments, preferred stockthat can be redeemed at the option of the holder is deemed to have an ``originalmaturity'' of the earliest possible date on which it may be so redeemed.(18) ``Public-sector entities'' include states, local authorities and governmentalsubdivisions below the central government level in an OECD country. Inthe United States, this definition encompasses a state, county, city, town,or other municipal corporation, a public authority, and generally any publicly-ownedentity that is an instrumentality of a state or municipal corporation.This definition does not include commercial companies owned by the publicsector.\1\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ <T3>See</T3> Definition (5), ``Central government,'' for further explanationof commercial companies owned by the public sector.(19) ``Reciprocal holdings of bank capital instruments'' means cross-holdingsor other formal or informal arrangements in which two or more banking organizationsswap, exchange, or otherwise agree to hold each other's capital instruments.This definition does not include holdings of capital instruments issuedby other banking organizations that were taken in satisfaction of debtspreviously contracted, provided that the reporting national bank has notheld such instruments for more than five years or a longer period approvedby the OCC.(20) ``Replacement cost'' means, with respect to interest rate and exchangerate contracts, the loss that would be incurred in the event of a counterpartydefault, as measured by the net cost of replacing the contract at the currentmarket value. If default would result in a theoretical profit, the replacementvalue is considered to be zero. The mark-to-market process should incorporatechanges in both interest rates and counterparty credit quality.(21) ``Residential properties'' means houses, condominiums, cooperativeunits, and manufactured homes. This definition does not include boats ormotor homes, even if used as a primary residence.(22) ``Risk-weighted assets'' means the sum of total risk-weighted balancesheet assets and the total of risk-weighted off-balance sheet credit equivalentamounts. Risk-weighted balance sheet and off-balance sheet assets are calculatedin accordance with Section 3 of this Appendix A.(23) ``State'' means any one of the several states of the United Statesof America, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and the territoriesand possessions of the United States.(24) ``Subsidiary'' means any corporation, partnership, business trust,joint venture, association or similar organization in which a nationalbank directly or indirectly holds more than a 50% ownership interest. Thisdefinition does not include ownership interests that were taken in satisfactionof debts previously contracted, provided that the reporting bank has notheld the interest for more than five years or a longer period approvedby the OCC.(25) ``Total capital'' means the sum of a national bank's core (Tier 1)and qualifying supplementary (Tier 2) capital elements.(26) ``Unconditionally cancellable,'' means, with respect to a commitment-typelending arrangement, that the bank may, at any time, with or without cause,refuse to advance funds or extend credit under the facility.(27) ``United States Government or its agencies'' means an instrumentalityof the U.S. Government whose debt obligations are fully and explicitlyguaranteed as to the timely payment of principal and interest by the fullfaith and credit of the United States Government.(28) ``United States Government-sponsored agency'' means an agency originallyestablished or chartered to serve public purposes specified by the UnitedStates Congress, but whose obligations are not explicitly guaranteed bythe full faith and credit of the United States Government.Section 2. Components of Capital.A national bank's qualifying capital base consists of two types of capital_core(Tier 1) and supplementary (Tier 2).(a) <T3>Tier 1 Capital.</T3> The following elements comprise a national bank'sTier 1 capital:(1) Common stockholders' equity;(2) Noncumulative perpetual preferred stock and related surplus; and \2\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ Preferred stock issues where the dividend is reset periodicallybased upon current market conditions and the bank's current credit rating,including but not limited to, auction rate, money market or remarketablepreferred stock, are assigned to Tier 2 capital, regardless of whetherthe dividends are cumulative or noncumulative. (3) Minority interests in the equity accounts of consolidated subsidiaries.(b) <T3>Tier 2 Capital.</T3> The following elements comprise a national bank'sTier 2 capital: (1) Allowance for loan and lease losses, up to a maximum of 1.25% of risk-weightedassets,\3\<NOTE/> subject to the transition rules in section 4(a)(2) of thisAppendix A; <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ The amount of the allowance for loan and lease lossesthat may be included in capital is based on a percentage of risk-weightedassets. A banking organization may deduct reserves for loan and lease lossesin excess of the amount permitted to be included as capital, as well asallocated transfer risk reserves and reserves held against other real estateowned, from the gross sum of risk-weighted assets in computing the denominatorof the risk-based capital ratio. (2) Cumulative perpetual preferred stock, long-term preferred stock, convertiblepreferred stock, and any related surplus, without limit, if the issuingnational bank has the option to defer payment of dividends on these instruments.For long-term preferred stock, the amount that is eligible to be includedas Tier 2 capital is reduced by 20% of the original amount of the instrument(net of redemptions) at the beginning of each of the last five years ofthe life of the instrument; (3) Hybrid capital instruments, without limit. Hybrid capital instrumentsare those instruments that combine certain characteristics of debt andequity, such as perpetual debt. To be included as Tier 2 capital, theseinstruments must meet the following criteria: \4\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ Mandatory convertible debt instruments that meet the requirementsof 12 CFR 3.100(e)(5), or that have been previously approved as capitalby the OCC, are treated as qualifying hybrid capital instruments. (i) The instrument must be unsecured, subordinated to the claims of depositorsand general creditors, and fully paid-up; (ii) The instrument must not be redeemable at the option of the holderprior to maturity, except with the prior approval of the OCC; (iii) The instrument must be available to participate in losses while theissuer is operating as a going concern (in this regard, the instrumentmust automatically convert to common stock or perpetual preferred stock,if the sum of the retained earnings and capital surplus accounts of theissuer shows a negative balance); and (iv) The instrument must provide the option for the issuer to defer principaland interest payments, if (A) The issuer does not report a net profit for the most recent combinedfour quarters, and (B) The issuer eliminates cash dividends on its common and preferred stock.(4) Term subordinated debt instruments, and intermediate-term preferredstock and related surplus are included in Tier 2 capital, but only to amaximum of 50% of Tier 1 capital. To be considered capital, term subordinateddebt instruments must meet the requirements of 12 CFR 3.100(f)(1). Also,at the beginning of each of the last five years of the life of either typeof instrument, the amount that is eligible to be included as Tier 2 capitalis reduced by 20% of the original amount of that instrument (net of redemptions).\5\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ Capital instruments may be redeemed prior to maturityand without the prior approval of the OCC, as long as the instruments areredeemed with the proceeds of, or replaced by, a like amount of a similaror higher quality capital instrument. However, the OCC must be notifiedin writing at least 30 days in advance of such redemption. (c) <T3>Deductions From Capital.</T3> The following items are deducted fromthe appropriate portion of a national bank's capital base when calculatingits risk-based capital ratio. (1) Deductions from Tier 1 capital: (i) All goodwill is deducted from Tier 1 capital before the Tier 2 portionof the calculation is made, subject to the transition rules contained insection 4(a)(1)(ii) of this Appendix A; \6\<NOTE/> and <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ The OCC may not require national banks to deduct goodwillthat they acquire, or have previously acquired, in connection with supervisorymergers with problem or failed depository institutions. Generally, thisdetermination will be made by the OCC on a case-by-case basis at the timeof the merger approval. (ii) Other intangible assets which do not meet the conditions establishedin section 2(c)(2) below, are deducted from Tier 1 capital before the Tier2 portion of the calculation is made. (2) Certain other intangible assets need not be deducted from Tier 1 capital,subject to the following conditions: (i) The intangible assets must meet each of the following criteria: (A) The intangible asset must be able to be separated and sold apart fromthe bank or from the bulk of the bank's assets; (B) The market value of the intangible asset must be established on anannual basis through an identifiable stream of cash flows, and there mustbe a high degree of certainty that the asset will hold this market valuenotwithstanding the future prospects of the bank; and(C) The bank must demonstrate that a market exists which will provide liquidityfor the intangible asset;(ii) Intangibles which are included as Tier 1 capital are limited to 25%of total Tier 1 capital and, for capital adequacy purposes, must be valuedat the lower of either the current amortized book value or the currentmarket value as established as part of the bank's annual audit.(3) Deductions from total capital:(i) Investments, both equity and debt, in unconsolidated banking and financesubsidiaries that are deemed to be capital of the subsidiary;\7\<NOTE/> and<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ The OCC may require deduction of investments in othersubsidiaries and associated companies, on a case-by-case basis.(ii) Reciprocal holdings of bank capital instruments.Section 3. Risk Categories/Weights for On-Balance Sheet Assets and Off-BalanceSheet ItemsThe denominator of the risk-based capital ratio, <T3>i.e.</T3>, a national bank's risk-weighted assets,\8\<NOTE/> is derived by assigning that bank's assets and off-balancesheet items to one of the four risk categories detailed in section 3(a)of this Appendix A. Each category has a specific risk weight. Before anoff-balance sheet item is assigned a risk weight, it is converted to anon-balance sheet credit equivalent amount in accordance with section 3(b)of this Appendix A. The risk weight assigned to a particular asset or on-balancesheet credit equivalent amount determines the percentage of that asset/creditequivalent that is included in the denominator of the bank's risk-basedcapital ratio. Any asset deducted from a bank's capital in computing thenumerator of the risk-based capital ratio is not included as part of thebank's risk-weighted assets.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ The OCC reserves the right to require a bank to computeits risk-based capital ratio on the basis of average, rather than period-end,risk-weighted assets when necessary to carry out the purposes of theseguidelines.Some of the assets on a bank's balance sheet may represent an indirectholding of a pool of assets, <T3>e.g.</T3>, mutual funds, that encompasses more than one risk weightwithin the pool. In those situations, the asset is assigned to the riskcategory applicable to the highest risk-weighted asset that pool is permittedto hold pursuant to its stated investment objectives. However, the minimumrisk weight that may be assigned to such a pool is 20%. If, in order tomaintain a necessary degree of liquidity, the fund is permitted to holdan insignificant amount of its investments in short-term, highly-liquidsecurities of superior credit quality (that do not qualify for a preferentialrisk weight), such securities generally will not be taken into accountin determining the risk category into which the bank's holding in the overallpool should be assigned. More detail on the treatment of mortgage-backedsecurities is provided in section 3(a)(3)(iv) of this Appendix A.(a) <T3>On-Balance Sheet Assets.</T3> The following are the risk categories/weightsfor on-balance sheet assets.(1) <T3>Zero percent risk weight.</T3> (i) Cash, including domestic and foreigncurrency owned and held in all offices of a national bank or in transit.Any foreign currency held by a national bank should be converted into U.S.dollar equivalents.(ii) Deposit reserves and other balances at Federal Reserve Banks.(iii) Securities issued by, and other direct claims on, the United StatesGovernment or its agencies, or the central government of an OECD country.(iv) That portion of assets directly and unconditionally guaranteed bythe United States Government or its agencies, or the central governmentof an OECD country.\9\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\9\ For the treatment of privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities where the underlying pool is comprised solely of mortgage-relatedsecurities issued by GNMA, <T3>see infra</T3> note 10.(v) Local currency claims on or guaranteed by central governments and centralbanks in non-OECD countries, to the extent the bank has local currencyliabilities in that country. Any amount of such claims that exceed theamount of the bank's local currency liabilities is assigned to the 100%risk category of section 3(a)(4) of this Appendix A, except in the caseof claims on a central bank with a residual maturity of one year or lesswhich would be assigned to the 20% risk category of section 3(a)(2).(vi) Gold bullion held in the bank's own vaults or in another bank's vaultson an allocated basis, to the extent it is backed by gold bullion liabilities.(vii) The book value of paid-in Federal Reserve Bank stock. (2) <T3>20 percent risk weight.</T3> (i) All claims on depository institutionsincorporated in an OECD country, and all assets backed by the full faithand credit of depository institutions incorporated in an OECD country.This includes the credit equivalent amount of participations in commitmentsand standby letters of credit sold to other depository institutions incorporatedin an OECD country, but only if the originating bank remains liable tothe customer or beneficiary for the full amount of the commitment or standbyletter of credit. Also included in this category are the credit equivalentamounts of risk participations in bankers' acceptances conveyed to otherdepository institutions incorporated in an OECD country. However, bank-issuedsecurities that qualify as capital of the issuing bank are not includedin this risk category, but are assigned to the 100% risk category of section3(a)(4) of this Appendix A. (ii) Claims on depository institutions incorporated in a non-OECD country,as well as claims on the central bank of a non-OECD country, with a residualmaturity of one year or less. (iii) Cash items in the process of collection. (iv) That portion of assets collateralized by the current market valueof securities issued or guaranteed by the United States Government or itsagencies, or the central government of an OECD country. (v) That portion of assets conditionally guaranteed by the United StatesGovernment or its agencies, or the central government of an OECD country.(vi) Securities issued by, or other direct claims on, United States Government-sponsoredagencies. (vii) That portion of assets guaranteed by United States Government-sponsoredagencies.\1\\0\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\0\Privately issued mortgage-backed securities, <T3>e.g.,</T3> CMOs and REMICs, where the underlying pool is comprisedsolely of mortgage-related securities issued by GNMA, FNMA and FHLMC, willbe treated as an indirect holding of the underlying assets and assignedto the 20% risk category of this section 3(a)(2). If the underlying poolis comprised of assets which attract different risk weights, <T3>e.g.,</T3> FNMA securities and conventional mortgages, the bank shouldgenerally assign the security to the highest risk category appropriatefor any asset in the pool. However, on a case-by-case basis, the OCC mayallow the bank to assign the security proportionately to the various riskcategories based on the proportion in which the risk categories are representedby the composition cash flows of the underlying pool of assets. Beforethe OCC will consider a request to proportionately risk-weight such a security,the bank must have current information for the reporting date that detailsthe composition and cash flows of the underlying pool of assets. Furthermore,before a mortgage-related security will receive a risk weight lower than100%, it must meet the criteria set forth in section 3(a)(3)(iv) of thisAppendix A.(viii) That portion of assets collateralized by the current market valueof securities issued or guaranteed by United States Government-sponsoredagencies. (ix) Claims representing general obligations of any public-sector entityin an OECD country, and that portion of any claims guaranteed by any suchpublic-sector entity. In the U.S., these obligations must meet the requirementsof 12 CFR 1.3(g). (x) Claims on, or guaranteed by, official multilateral lending institutionsor regional development institutions in which the United States Governmentis a shareholder or contributing member.\1\\1\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\1\These institutions include, but are not limited to,the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development (World Bank),the Inter-American Development Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the AfricanDevelopment Bank, the European Investments Bank, the International MonetaryFund and the Bank for International Settlements. (xi) That portion of assets collateralized by the current market valueof securities issued by official multilateral lending institutions or regionaldevelopment institutions in which the United States Government is a shareholderor contributing member. (xii) Assets collateralized by cash held in a segregated deposit accountby the reporting national bank. (3) <T3>50 percent risk weight.</T3> (i) Revenue obligations of any public-sectorentity in an OECD country for which the underlying obligor is the public-sectorentity, but which are repayable solely from the revenues generated by theproject financed through the issuance of the obligations. (ii) The credit equivalent amount of interest rate and exchange rate contracts,calculated in accordance with section 3(b)(5) of this Appendix A, thatdo not qualify for inclusion in a lower risk category. (iii) Loans secured by first mortgages on one-to-four family residentialproperties, either owner-occupied or rented, provided that such loans arenot more than 90 days past due, or on nonaccrual or restructured. It ispresumed that such loans will meet prudent underwriting standards. Furthermore,residential property loans that are made for the purpose of constructionfinancing are assigned to the 100% risk category of section 3(a)(4) ofthis Appendix A; however, this exclusion from the 50% risk category doesnot apply to loans to individual purchasers for the construction of theirown homes. (iv) Privately-issued mortgage-backed securities, <T3>i.e., </T3>those that do not carry the guarantee of a government orgovernment-sponsored agency, fully secured by mortgages that, at the timeof origination, qualify for this 50% risk weight under section 3(a)(3)(iii)above,\12\<NOTE/> provided they meet the following criteria:<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\12\ If all of the underlying mortgages in the pool do notqualify for the 50% risk weight, the bank should generally assign the entirevalue of the security to the 100% risk category of section 3(a)(4) of thisAppendix A; however, on a case-by-case basis, the OCC may allow the bankto assign only the portion of the security which represents an interestin, and the cash flows of, nonqualifying mortgages to the 100% risk category,with the remainder being assigned a risk weight of 50%. Before the OCCwill consider a request to risk weight a mortgage-backed security on aproportionate basis, the bank must have current information for the reportingdate that details the composition and cash flows of the underlying poolof mortgages.(A) The underlying assets must be held by an independent trustee that hasa first priority, perfected security interest in the underlying assetsfor the benefit of the holders of the security;(B) The holder of the security must have an undivided pro rata ownershipinterest in the underlying assets or the trust that issues the securitymust have no liabilities unrelated to the issued securities;(C) The trust that issues the security must be structured such that thecash flows from the underlying assets fully meet the cash flows requirementsof the security without undue reliance on any reinvestment income; and(D) There must not be any material reinvestment risk associated with anyfunds awaiting distribution to the holder of the security.(4) <T3>100 percent risk weight. </T3>All other assets not specified above,including, but not limited to:(i) Claims on or guaranteed by depository institutions incorporated ina non-OECD country, as well as claims on the central bank of a non-OECDcountry, with a residual maturity exceeding one year.(ii) All non-local currency claims on non-OECD central governments, aswell as local currency claims on non-OECD central governments that arenot included in section 3(a)(1)(v) of this Appendix A.(iii) Any classes of a mortgage-backed security that can absorb more thantheir pro rata share of the principal loss without the whole issue beingin default, <T3>e.g., </T3>subordinated classes or residual interests, regardless ofthe issuer or guarantor.(iv) All stripped mortgage-backed securities, including interest only portions(IOs), principal only portions (POs) and other similar instruments, regardlessof the issuer or guarantor.(v) Obligations issued by any state or any political subdivision thereoffor the benefit of a private party or enterprise where that party or enterprise,rather than the issuing state or political subdivision, is responsiblefor the timely payment of principal and interest on the obligation, <T3>e.g., </T3>industrial development bonds.(vi) Claims on commercial enterprises owned by non-OECD and OECD centralgovernments.(vii) Any investment in an unconsolidated subsidiary that is not requiredto be deducted from total capital pursuant to section 2(c)(3) of this AppendixA. (viii) Instruments issued by depository institutions incorporated in OECDand non-OECD countries that qualify as capital of the issuer.(ix) Investments in fixed assets, premises, and other real estate owned.(b) <T3>Off-Balance Sheet Activities. </T3>The risk weight assigned to an off-balancesheet activity is determined by a two-step process. First, the face amountof the off-balance sheet item is multiplied by the appropriate credit conversionfactor specified in this section. This calculation translates the faceamount of an off-balance sheet item into an on-balance sheet credit equivalentamount. Second, the resulting credit equivalent amount is then assignedto the proper risk category using the criteria regarding obligors, guarantorsand collateral listed in section 3(a) of this Appendix A; however, collateraland guarantees are applied to the face amount of an off-balance sheet item,not the credit equivalent amount of such an item. The following are thecredit conversion factors and the off-balance sheet items to which theyapply.(1) <T3>100 percent credit conversion factor. </T3>(i) Direct credit substitutes,including financial guarantee-type standby letters of credit that supportfinancial claims on the account party.\1\\3\<NOTE/> The face amount of a direct credit substitute is netted againstthe amount of any participations sold in that item. The amount not soldis converted to an on-balance sheet credit equivalent and assigned to theproper risk category using the criteria regarding obligors, guarantorsand collateral listed in section 3(a) of this Appendix A. Participationsare treated as follows:<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\3\For purposes of this section 3(b)(1)(i), a ``financialguarantee-type standby letter of credit'' is any letter of credit, or similararrangement, however named or described, which represents an irrevocableobligation to the beneficiary on the part of the issuer (1) to repay moneyborrowed by or advanced to or for the account of the account party or (2)to make payment on account of any indebtedness undertaken by the accountparty, in the event that the account party fails to fulfill its obligationto the beneficiary. Performance-based standby letters of credit are defineddifferently in section 3(b)(2)(i), <T3>infra </T3>note 16.(A) If the originating bank remains liable to the beneficiary for the fullamount of the standby letter of credit, in the event the participant failsto perform under its participation agreement, the amount of participationssold are converted to an on-balance sheet credit equivalent using a creditconversion factor of 100%, with that amount then being assigned to therisk category appropriate for the purchaser of the participation.(B) If the participations are such that each participant is responsibleonly for its pro rata share of the risk, and there is no recourse to theoriginating bank, the full amount of the participations sold is excludedfrom the originating bank's risk-weighted assets;(ii) Risk participations purchased in bankers' acceptances and participationspurchased in direct credit substitutes;(iii) Assets sold under an agreement to repurchase and assets sold withrecourse,\1\\4\<NOTE/> to the extent that these assets are not reported on a nationalbank's statement of condition (this includes loan strips sold without directrecourse, where the maturity of the participation is shorter than the maturityof the underlying loan); and <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\4\For risk-based capital purposes, the definition of thesale of assets with recourse, including one-to-four family residentialmortgage loans, is the same as the definition contained in the Instructionsfor the preparation of the Consolidated Reports of Condition and Income(the Call Report).(iv) Contingent obligations with a certain draw down, <T3>e.g.</T3>, legally binding agreements to purchase assets as a specifiedfuture date.(v) Indemnification of customers whose securities the bank has lent asagent. If the customer is not indemnified against loss by the bank, thetransaction is excluded from the risk-based capital calculation.\1\\5\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\5\When a bank lends its own securities, the transactionis treated as a loan. When a bank lends its own securities or, acting asagent, agrees to indemnify a customer, the transaction is assigned to therisk weight appropriate to the obligor or collateral that is deliveredto the lending or indemnifying institution or to an independent custodianacting on their behalf.(2) <T3>50 percent credit conversion factor. </T3>(i) Transaction-related contingenciesincluding, among other things, performance bonds and performance-basedstandby letters of credit related to a particular transaction.\1\\6\<NOTE/> To the extent permitted by law or regulation, performance-basedstandby letters of credit include such things as arrangements backing subcontractors'and suppliers' performance, labor and materials contracts, and constructionbids;<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\6\For purposes of this section 3(b)(2)(i), a ``performance-basedstandby letter of credit'' is any letter of credit, or similar arrangement,however named or described, which represents an irrevocable obligationto the beneficiary on the part of the issuer to make payment on accountof any default by the account party in the performance of a nonfinancialor commercial obligation. Participations in performance-based standby lettersof credit are treated in accordance with the provisions of section 3(b)(1)(i)(A)andamp;(B)of this Appendix A. Financial guarantee-type standby letters of creditare defined in section 3(b)(1)(i), <T3>supra </T3>note 13.(ii) Unused portion of commitments, including home equity lines of credit,with an original maturity exceeding one year;\1\\7\<NOTE/> and <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\7\Participations in commitments are treated in accordancewith the provisions of section 3(b)(1)(i)(A)andamp;(B) of this Appendix A.Until December 31, 1992, national banks will be permitted to use remainingmaturity in determining the appropriate credit conversion factor for theunused portion of loan commitments.(iii) Revolving underwriting facilities, note issuance facilities, andsimilar arrangements pursuant to which the bank's customer can issue short-termdebt obligations in its own name, but for which the bank has a legallybinding commitment to either:(A) Purchase the obligations the customer is unable to sell by a stateddate; or (B) Advance funds to its customer, if the obligations cannot be sold.(3) <T3>20 percent credit conversion factor. </T3>(i) Trade-related contingencies.These are short-term self-liquidating instruments used to finance the movementof goods and are collateralized by the underlying shipment. A commercialletter of credit is an example of such an instrument.(4) <T3>Zero percent credit conversion factor.</T3> (i) Unused commitmentswith an original maturity of one year or less;(ii) Unused commitments with an original maturity of greater than one year,if:(A) They are unconditionally cancellable,\1\\8\<NOTE/> and<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\8\ In the case of home equity lines of credit, the bankis deemed able to unconditionally cancel the commitment if it can, at itsoption, prohibit additional extensions of credit, reduce the credit lineand terminate the commitment to the full extent permitted by relevant Federallaw.(B) The bank has the contractual right to, and in fact does, make a separatecredit decision based upon the borrower's current financial condition,before each drawing under the lending facility; and(iii) Unused portion of retail credit card lines that are unconditionallycancellable in accordance with applicable law by the bank.(5) <T3>Interest rate and exchange rate contracts.</T3> The credit equivalentamount of such contracts is the sum of two measures of credit exposure_currentand potential credit exposure.(i) <T3>Current credit exposure</T3>_The replacement cost of the contract reflectsthe current credit exposure, and is measured in U.S. dollars, regardlessof the currency specified in the contract. A bank may net multiple contractswith a single counterparty only if those contracts are subject to novation.(ii) <T3>Potential credit exposure</T3>_To complete the calculation of the on-balancesheet credit equivalent amount of a contract, an estimate of the potentialincrease in credit exposure over the remaining life of the contract isadded on (the ``add-on'') to the contract's current credit exposure, includingcontracts with no current credit exposure. The add-on is calculated bymultiplying the notional principal amount of the contract by one of thefollowing credit conversion factors, as appropriate: \1\\9\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\9\ No potential credit exposure is calculated for singlecurrency floating/floating interest rate swaps; rather, the on-balancesheet credit equivalent of these contracts is evaluated solely on the basisof the amount of their current credit exposure.(A) Interest rate contracts_(I) Zero percent, if the contract has a remaining maturity of one yearor less, and (II) 0.5%, for contracts with a remaining maturity greater than one year;(B) Exchange rate contracts_(I) 1.0%, if the contract has a remaining maturity of one year or less,and(II) 5.0%, for contracts with a remaining maturity greater than one year.(iii) <T3>Risk weighting</T3>_The credit equivalent amount, which is derivedfrom sections 3(b)(5) (i) and (ii) of this Appendix A, is then assignedto the proper risk category using the criteria regarding obligors, guarantors,and collateral listed in section 3(a) of this Appendix A.\2\\0\<NOTE/> However, the maximum risk weight assigned to the credit equivalentamount of an interest rate or exchange rate contract is 50%.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\0\ Interest rate and exchange rate contracts are an exceptionto the general rule of applying collateral and guarantees to the face valueof off-balance sheet items. The sufficiency of collateral and guaranteesis determined on the basis of the credit equivalent amount of interestrate and exchange rate contracts.(iv) <T3>Exceptions</T3>_The following contracts are not subject to the abovecalculation and, therefore, are not considered part of the denominatorof a national bank's risk-based capital ratio:(A) Exchange rate contracts with an original maturity of 14 calendar daysor less; and(B) Any interest rate or exchange rate contract that is traded on an exchangerequiring the daily payment of any variations in the market value of thecontract.Section 4. Implementation, Transition Rules, and Target Ratios(a) <T3>December 31, 1990 to December 30, 1992.</T3> During this time period:(1) All national banks are expected to maintain a minimum ratio of totalcapital (after deductions) to risk-weighted assets of 7.25%.(i) Fifty percent of this 7.25% must be made up of Tier 1 capital; however,up to 10% of Tier 1 capital can be comprised of Tier 2 capital elements,before any deductions for goodwill. The amount of Tier 2 elements includedin Tier 1 will not be subject to the sublimits on the amount of such elementsin Tier 2 capital, with the exception of the allowance for loan and leaselosses.(ii) Goodwill that national banks have been allowed to count as capitalas a result of the transition rules contained in 12 CFR 3.3 is grandfathereduntil December 31, 1992, but will be deducted from Tier 1 capital afterthat date.(2) The allowance for loan and lease losses can be included in total capitalup to a maximum of 1.5% of a bank's risk-weighted assets, including theportion that can be borrowed to make up Tier 1.(3) Tier 2 capital elements that are not used as part of Tier 1 capitalwill qualify as part of a national bank's total capital base up to a maximumof 100% of the bank's Tier 1 capital.(4) In addition to the standards established by these risk-based capitalguidelines, all national banks must maintain a minimum capital-to-totalassets ratio in accordance with the provisions of 12 CFR Part 3.(b) <T3>On December 31, 1992.</T3> (1) All national banks are expected to maintaina minimum ratio of total capital (after deductions) to risk-weighted assetsof 8.0%.(2) Tier 2 capital elements qualify as part of a national bank's totalcapital base up to a maximum of 100% of that bank's Tier 1 capital.(3) In addition to the standards established by these risk-based capitalguidelines, all national banks must maintain a minimum capital-to-totalassets ratio in accordance with the provisions of 12 CFR Part 3.<ITAG tagnum="74">Table 1._Summary of Risk Weights and Risk Categories</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Category 1: Zero Percent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Cash (domestic and foreign).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Balances due from, and claims on, Federal Reserve Banks and centralbanks in other OECD countries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Claims on, or unconditionally guaranteed by, the U.S. Governmentor its agencies, or other OECD central governments.\1\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ For the purpose of calculating the risk-based capitalratio, a U.S. Government agency is defined as an instrumentality of theU.S. Government whose obligations are fully and explicitly guaranteed asto the timely repayment of principal and interest by the full faith andcredit of the U.S. Government.<ITAG tagnum="21">4. Local currency claims on non-OECD central governments and centralbanks, to the extent the bank has local currency liabilities in that country.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Gold bullion held in the bank's own vaults or in another bank'svaults on an allocated basis, to the extent it is backed by gold bullionliabilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Federal Reserve Bank stock.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Category 2: 20 Percent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Portions of loans and other assets collateralized by securitiesissued or guaranteed by the U.S. Government or its agencies, or other OECDcentral governments.\2\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ Degree of collateralization is determined by current marketvalue.<ITAG tagnum="21">2. Portions of loans and other assets conditionally guaranteed bythe U.S. Government or its agencies, or other OECD central governments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Portions of loans and other assets collateralized by cash on depositin the lending institution.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. All claims (long- and short-term) on, or guaranteed by, OECD depositoryinstitutions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD depository institutions,including central banks, with a residual maturity of one year or less.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Cash items in the process of collection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Securities and other claims on, or guaranteed by, U.S. Government-sponsoredagencies.\3\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ For the purpose of calculating the risk-based capitalratio, a U.S. Government-sponsored agency is defined as an agency originallyestablished or chartered to serve public purposes specified by the U.S.Congress but whose obligations are not explicitly guaranteed by the fullfaith and credit of the U.S. Government.<ITAG tagnum="21">8. Portions of loans and other assets collateralized by securitiesissued by, or guaranteed by, U.S. Government-sponsored agencies.\4\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ Degree of collateralization is determined by current marketvalue.<ITAG tagnum="21">9. Claims that represent general obligations of, and portions of claimsguaranteed by, public-sector entities in OECD countries, below the levelof central government.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Claims on or guaranteed by official multilateral lending institutionsor regional development institutions in which the U.S. Government is ashareholder or a contributing member.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Portions of loans and other assets collateralized with securitiesissued by official multilateral lending institutions or regional developmentinstitutions in which the U.S. Government is a shareholder or a contributingmember.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Category 3: 50 Percent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Revenue bonds or similar obligations, including loans and leases,that are obligations of public sector entities in OECD countries, but forwhich the government entity is committed to repay the debt only out ofrevenues from the facilities financed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Credit equivalent amounts of interest rate and exchange rate relatedcontracts, except for those assigned to a lower risk category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Assets secured by a first mortgage on a one-to-four family residentialproperty that are not more than 90 days past due, on nonaccrual or restructured.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Category 4: 100 Percent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. All other claims on private obligors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Claims on non-OECD financial institutions with a residual maturityexceeding one year. Claims on non-OECD central banks with a residual maturityexceeding one year are included in this category unless they qualify foritem 4 of Category 1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Claims on non-OECD central governments that are not included initem 4 of Category 1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Obligations issued by state or local governments (including industrialdevelopment authorities and similar entities) repayable solely by a privateparty or enterprise.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Premises, plant, and equipment; other fixed assets; and other realestate owned.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries, joint ventures, orassociated companies (unless deducted from capital).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Capital instruments issued by other banking organizations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. All other assets (including claims on commercial firms owned bythe public sector).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="75">Table 2_Credit Conversion Factors for Off-Balance Sheet Items</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">100 Percent Conversion Factor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Direct credit substitutes (general guarantees of indebtedness andguarantee-type instruments, including standby letters of credit servingas financial guarantees for, or supporting, loans and securities).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Risk participations in bankers acceptances and participations indirect credit substitutes (<T3>e.g., </T3>standby letters of credit).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Sale and repurchase agreements and asset sales with recourse, ifnot already included on the balance sheet.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Forward agreements (<T3>i.e., </T3>contractual obligations) to purchase assets, including financingfacilities with <T3>certain </T3>drawdown.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">50 Percent Conversion Factor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Transaction-related contingencies (<T3>e.g., </T3>bid bonds, performance bonds, warranties, and standby lettersof credit related to particular transactions).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Unused commitments with an original maturity exceeding one year.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Revolving underwriting facilities (RUFs), note issuance facilities(NIFs) and other similar arrangements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">20 Percent Conversion Factor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Short-term, self-liquidating trade-related contingencies, includingcommercial letters of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Zero Percent Conversion Factor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Unused commitments with an original maturity of one year or less.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Unused commitments which are unconditionally cancellable at anytime, regardless of maturity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="75">Table 3_Treatment of Interest Rate and Exchange Rate Contracts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Current Exposure Method (described below) is utilized to calculatethe ``credit equivalent amounts'' of these instruments. These amounts areassigned a risk weight appropriate to the obligor or any collateral orguarantee. However, the maximum risk weight is limited to 50 percent. Multiplecontracts with a single counterparty may be netted if those contracts aresubject to novation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,r25,r25</C> <H1>Residual maturity </H1><H1>Interest rate contracts </H1><H1>Exchange rate contracts</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">One year and less <D>Replacement Cost (RC) </D><D>RC+1.0% of total notional principal (NP).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over one year <D>RC+0.5% of NP </D><D>RC+5.0% of NP.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following instruments will be excluded:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Exchange rate contracts with an original maturity of 14 calendardays or less, and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Instruments traded on exchanges and subject to daily marginrequirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Table 4_Definition of Capital</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Capital components are distributed between two categories (Tier 1and Tier 2). Tier 2 capital elements will qualify as part of a bank's totalcapital base up to a maximum of 100% of that bank's Tier 1 capital. BeginningDecember 31, 1992, the minimum risk-based capital standard will be 8.0%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Definition of Capital</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Tier 1:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Common stockholders' equity;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Noncumulative perpetual preferred stock and any related surplus;and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Minority interests in the equity accounts of consolidatedsubsidiaries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Tier 2:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Cumulative perpetual, long-term and convertible preferredstock, and any related surplus; \5\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ The amount of long-term and intermediate-term preferredstock, as well as term subordinated debt that is eligible to be includedas Tier 2 capital is reduced by 20% of the original amount of the instrumentat the beginning of each of the last five years of the life of the instrument.<ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Perpetual debt and other hybrid debt/equity instruments;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Intermediate-term preferred stock and term subordinated debt(to a maximum of 50% of Tier 1 capital); and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Loan loss reserves (to a maximum of 1.25% of risk-weightedassets).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Deductions from Capital:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">From Tier 1:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Goodwill and other intangibles, with the exception of identifiedintangibles that satisfy the criteria included in the guidelines.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">From Total Capital:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Investments in unconsolidated banking and finance subsidiaries;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Reciprocal holdings of capital instruments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Transitional Definition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">During a transition period beginning December 31, 1990, all nationalbanks are expected to maintain a capital to risk-weighted asset ratio of7.25%, of which at least 3.25 percentage points must consist of Tier 1capital. In other words, during this period upon to approximately 4 percentagepoints of the 7.25% capital ratio may consist of Tier 2 capital. Also duringthis period, the sublimit on loan loss reserves will be 1.5% of risk-weightedassets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Robert L. Clarke,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Comptroller of the Currency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Date: December 21, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-1669 Filed 1-26-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4810-33-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>